New York, session 2025-2026, S600.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 239-c of the general municipal law, as amended by chapter 662 of 3 the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) Each member of a county planning board shall complete, at a mini- 5 mum, [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such 6 members to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by 7 a member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for 8 environmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 9 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 10 paragraph. Such training shall be approved by the county and may 11 include, but not be limited to, training provided by a regional or coun- 12 ty planning office or commission, county planning federation, state 13 agency, statewide municipal association, college or other similar enti- 14 ty. Training shall include at least one hour related to environmentally 15 conscious planning, including, but not to be limited to, training to 16 meet the goals of and compliance with the climate leadership and commu- 17 nity protection act, including any grant and funding opportunities, 18 farmland and natural resource conservation, climate justice, environ- 19 mentally conscious site design, building material techniques and water EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02018-02-5 S. 600--A 2 1 mitigation and energy systems best practices. Training may be provided 2 in a variety of formats, including but not limited to, electronic media, 3 video, distance learning and traditional classroom training. 4 § 2. Paragraph a of subdivision 7-a of section 27 of the general city 5 law, as added by chapter 662 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 a. Each member of the planning board of a city, except a city having a 8 population of more than one million, shall complete, at a minimum, 9 [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such members 10 to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by a 11 member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for envi- 12 ronmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 13 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 14 subdivision. Such training shall be approved by the legislative body and 15 may include, but not be limited to, training provided by a municipality, 16 regional or county planning office or commission, county planning feder- 17 ation, state agency, statewide municipal association, college or other 18 similar entity. Training shall include at least one hour related to 19 environmentally conscious planning, including, but not to be limited to, 20 training to meet the goals of and compliance with the climate leadership 21 and community protection act, including any grant and funding opportu- 22 nities, farmland and natural resource conservation, climate justice, 23 environmentally conscious site design, building material techniques and 24 water mitigation and energy systems best practices. Training may be 25 provided in a variety of formats, including but not limited to, elec- 26 tronic media, video, distance learning and traditional classroom train- 27 ing. 28 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 7-a of section 81 of the general 29 city law, as added by chapter 662 of the laws of 2006, is amended to 30 read as follows: 31 (a) Each member of the board of appeals in a city, except a city 32 having a population of more than one million, shall complete, at a mini- 33 mum, [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such 34 members to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by 35 a member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for 36 environmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 37 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 38 subdivision. Such training shall be approved by the legislative body and 39 may include, but not be limited to, training provided by a municipality, 40 regional or county planning office or commission, county planning feder- 41 ation, state agency, statewide municipal association, college or other 42 similar entity. Training shall include at least one hour related to 43 environmentally conscious planning, including, but not to be limited to, 44 training to meet the goals of and compliance with the climate leadership 45 and community protection act, including any grant and funding opportu- 46 nities, farmland and natural resource conservation, climate justice, 47 environmentally conscious site design, building material techniques and 48 water mitigation and energy systems best practices. Training may be 49 provided in a variety of formats, including but not limited to, elec- 50 tronic media, video, distance learning and traditional classroom train- 51 ing. 52 § 4. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 7-a of section 267 of the town law, 53 as added by chapter 662 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 54 follows: 55 (a) Each member of the board of appeals shall complete, at a minimum, 56 [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such members S. 600--A 3 1 to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by a 2 member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for envi- 3 ronmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 4 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 5 subdivision. Such training shall be approved by the town board and may 6 include, but not be limited to, training provided by a municipality, 7 regional or county planning office or commission, county planning feder- 8 ation, state agency, statewide municipal association, college or other 9 similar entity. Training shall include at least one hour related to 10 environmentally conscious planning, including, but not to be limited to, 11 training to meet the goals of and compliance with the climate leadership 12 and community protection act, including any grant and funding opportu- 13 nities, farmland and natural resource conservation, climate justice, 14 environmentally conscious site design, building material techniques and 15 water mitigation and energy systems best practices. Training may be 16 provided in a variety of formats, including but not limited to, elec- 17 tronic media, video, distance learning and traditional classroom train- 18 ing. 19 § 5. Paragraph a of subdivision 7-a of section 271 of the town law, 20 as added by chapter 662 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 a. Each member of the planning board shall complete, at a minimum, 23 [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such members 24 to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by a 25 member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for envi- 26 ronmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 27 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 28 subdivision. Such training shall be approved by the town board and may 29 include, but not be limited to, training provided by a municipality, 30 regional or county planning office or commission, county planning feder- 31 ation, state agency, statewide municipal association, college or other 32 similar entity. Training shall include at least one hour related to 33 environmentally conscious planning, including, but not to be limited to, 34 training to meet the goals of and compliance with the climate leadership 35 and community protection act, including any grant and funding opportu- 36 nities, farmland and natural resource conservation, climate justice, 37 environmentally conscious site design, building material techniques and 38 water mitigation and energy systems best practices. Training may be 39 provided in a variety of formats, including but not limited to, elec- 40 tronic media, video, distance learning and traditional classroom train- 41 ing. 42 § 6. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 7-a of section 7-712 of the village 43 law, as added by chapter 662 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 44 follows: 45 (a) Each member of the board of appeals shall complete, at a minimum, 46 [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such members 47 to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by a 48 member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for envi- 49 ronmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 50 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 51 subdivision. Such training shall be approved by the board of trustees 52 and may include, but not be limited to, training provided by a munici- 53 pality, regional or county planning office or commission, county plan- 54 ning federation, state agency, statewide municipal association, college 55 or other similar entity. Training shall include at least one hour 56 related to environmentally conscious planning, including, but not to be S. 600--A 4 1 limited to, training to meet the goals of and compliance with the 2 climate leadership and community protection act, including any grant and 3 funding opportunities, farmland and natural resource conservation, 4 climate justice, environmentally conscious site design, building materi- 5 al techniques and water mitigation and energy systems best practices. 6 Training may be provided in a variety of formats, including but not 7 limited to, electronic media, video, distance learning and traditional 8 classroom training. 9 § 7. Paragraph a of subdivision 7-a of section 7-718 of the village 10 law, as added by chapter 662 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 a. Each member of the planning board shall complete, at a minimum, 13 [four] five hours of training each year designed to enable such members 14 to more effectively carry out their duties. Training received by a 15 member in excess of [four] five hours in any one year, except for envi- 16 ronmentally conscious planning training, may be carried over by the 17 member into succeeding years in order to meet the requirements of this 18 subdivision. Such training shall be approved by the board of trustees 19 and may include, but not be limited to, training provided by a munici- 20 pality, regional or county planning office or commission, county plan- 21 ning federation, state agency, statewide municipal association, college 22 or other similar entity. Training shall include at least one hour 23 related to environmentally conscious planning, including, but not to be 24 limited to, training to meet the goals of and compliance with the 25 climate leadership and community protection act, including any grant and 26 funding opportunities, farmland and natural resource conservation, 27 climate justice, environmentally conscious site design, building materi- 28 al techniques and water mitigation and energy systems best practices. 29 Training may be provided in a variety of formats, including but not 30 limited to, electronic media, video, distance learning and traditional 31 classroom training. 32 § 8. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 33 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.